New Mexico, session 2026, SB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 21-1-34 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 330, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "21-1-34. EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION EQUIPMENT REPLACEMENT FUND--DISBURSEMENT.--The "educational television equipment replacement fund" is created as a nonreverting fund in the state treasury. The higher education department shall develop criteria and promulgate rules for the disbursement of money in this fund for the replacement of equipment at educational television and radio stations operated by state institutions of higher education or public schools. Disbursement shall be made to the institutions by warrant of the department of finance and administration upon vouchers signed by the secretary of higher education. It is the intent of the legislature that [in subsequent years] a specific line item for educational television and radio replacement shall be included in the appropriations recommended for educational television and radio by the department. [The appropriation to the fund in the General Appropriation Act of 1982 shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year, and no subsequent appropriation to the fund shall revert unless it contains the sentence "The appropriation to the educational television equipment replacement fund shall revert".]" - 2 -